Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF FAIRMONT; SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of a UV/biosolids project in the city of Fairmont are exempt from sales and use tax under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, provided that the materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after September 11, 2024, and before January 11, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of a storage tank project in the city of Fairmont are exempt from sales and use tax under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, provided that the materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after January 1, 2025, and before June 2, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of a public works building in the city of Fairmont are exempt from sales and use tax under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, provided that the materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after May 31, 2021, and before March 8, 2024. new text end new text begin (d) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). Refunds for eligible purchases must not be issued until after June 30, 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1, paragraphs (a) to (c) is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin (a) Subdivision 1, paragraph (a), is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after September 11, 2024, and before January 11, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) Subdivision 1, paragraph (b), is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after January 1, 2025, and before June 2, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) Subdivision 1, paragraph (c), is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after May 31, 2021, and before March 8, 2024. new text end